Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-1-1

through

53-1-6

, and was based on Orig. Code 1863, § 2239; Code 1868, § 2233; Code 1873, § 2259; Code 1882, § 2259; Civil Code 1895, § 3094; Civil Code 1910, § 3670; Code 1933, § 85-608; Ga. L. 1962, p. 623, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 123, § 1; Code 1981, §

53-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1036, § 2; Code 1981, §

53-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1193, § 1; Code 1981, §

53-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 350, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 9.